Washington statutes.
RCW 15.66.110

Commodity commission—Composition—Terms.

(1) Every marketing order shall establish a commodity commission composed of not less than five nor more than fifteen members. Commission members shall be citizens and residents of this state if required by the marketing order, and over the age of eighteen. Not more than one commission member may be part of the same "person" as defined by this chapter. The term of office of commission members shall be three years with the terms rotating so than one-third of the terms will commence as nearly as practicable each year. However, the first commission shall be selected, one-third for a term of one year, one-third for a term of two years, and one-third for a term of three years, as nearly as practicable. Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, no less than sixty percent of the commission members shall be elected by the affected producers and such elected members shall all be affected producers. Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, the remaining members shall be appointed by the commission and shall be either affected producers, others active in matters relating to the affected commodity, or persons not so related.

(2) A marketing order may provide that a majority of the commission be appointed by the director.

(3) In the event that the marketing order provides that a majority of the commission be appointed by the director, the marketing order shall incorporate the provisions of RCW 15.66.113 for member selection.

(4) The director shall appoint to every commission one member who represents the director. The director is a voting member of each commodity commission.

[ 2003 c 396 s 4; 2002 c 313 s 51; 2001 c 315 s 2; 1961 c 11 s 15.66.110. Prior: 1955 c 191 s 11.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.